Massachusetts, session 194th, S1532.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 70E of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “law”, in line 46, the following
words:- , provided that confidentiality shall extend to a facility’s common areas and waiting
rooms.
SECTION 2. Said section 70E, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by adding the
following paragraph:-
Providers shall develop and implement a system to protect the confidentiality of all
patients and residents throughout the facility, including common areas and waiting rooms.
Providers shall not be permitted to announce the first and or last name of patients in common
of 2

areas and waiting rooms and shall implement a program that provides anonymity such as a
patient numbering system or the use of electronic pagers.
of 2